New Jersey, session 221, A3496.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  R.S.39:3-54 is amended to read as follows: 39:3-54. a.  Any lighted lamp or illuminating device upon a motor vehicle other than a headlamp, spot lamp or auxiliary driving lamp which projects a beam of light of an intensity greater than 300 candlepower shall be so directed that no part of the beam will strike the level of the roadway on which the vehicle stands at a distance of more than 75 feet from the vehicle. Flashing lights are prohibited on motor vehicles, motorcycles and motor-drawn vehicles except as a means for indicating a right or left turn; provided, however, any vehicle may be equipped, and when required under this article shall be equipped, with lamps for the purpose of warning the operators of other vehicles of the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking or passing, and when so equipped, shall display such warning in addition to any other warning signals required by law. The lamps used to display such warning shall be of a type approved by the [Director of the Division of Motor Vehicles] Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission; those used to display warning to the front shall be mounted at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, and shall display simultaneously flashing white or amber lights, or any shade of color between white and amber. The lamps used to display such warning to the rear shall be mounted at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, and shall show simultaneously flashing amber or red lights, or any shade of color between amber and red. These warning lights shall be visible from a distance of not less than 500 feet at any time when lighted lamps are required. The two front and two rear turn signals shall be flashed simultaneously to display such warning on vehicles of the types mentioned in [section 39:3-64] R.S.39:3-64. b.   In addition to the flashing devices permitted in subsection a. of this section, an omnibus may be equipped with two flashing devices for the purpose  of warning the operators of other vehicles and law enforcement officials that  an emergency situation exists within the omnibus. These devices shall be capable of activation by the operator of the omnibus and shall be of a type approved by the [Director of the Division of Motor Vehicles] Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. They shall be mounted one at the front and one at the rear of the omnibus and shall display flashing red lights which shine on the roadway under the vehicle. c.  1[In] Under the authority of the Department of Transportation and without any additional permit required by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, in1 addition to the amber light authorized to be displayed pursuant to subsection a. of this section, one or more green lights may be affixed to any motor vehicle that is used for the removal or prevention of ice and snow on roadways, and which vehicle is  owned and operated by the State 1, any bi-state or interstate governmental agency or authority,1 or any local government unit, 1or is contracted by the Department of Transportation for such use,1 except that the green lights may only be displayed on such vehicle when the vehicle is engaged in an operation that presents a vehicular traffic hazard that requires the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking, or passing the vehicle, and the vehicle also displays the amber light or lights required pursuant to subsection a. of this section. (cf: P.L.1985, c.536, s.1) 2.  R.S.39:3-50 is amended to read as follows: 39:3-50.  All lamps and reflectors, which display a light visible from directly in front of a vehicle as authorized by this subtitle, shall exhibit lights substantially white, yellow or amber in color. (a)   The color of light emitted or reflected by exterior lamps or reflectors on a vehicle shall be as follows, except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of this section: White when the lamp is a headlamp, or spot lamp, or illuminates a license plate or a destination sign; or is located on the outside limit of a side car or other attachment on a motor cycle; Substantially white or amber when the lamp is a side-cowl or fender lamp, running-board or other courtesy lamp, front parking lamp, back-up lamp, auxiliary driving lamp; or a turn signal on or facing the front; Substantially red or amber when the lamp is a turn signal or a stop lamp on or facing the rear; Red when any other lamp or any reflector is on the rear or on either side at or near the rear, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (f) of [section 39:3-61] R.S.39:3-61 for a combination marker lamp; Amber when any other lamp or reflector is on the front or on either side other than at or near the rear. (b)   Lamps and reflectors on projecting loads shall emit or reflect light with color as provided in section 10 of 1[this act] P.L.1964, c.136 (C.39:3-61.4)1. (c)   No person shall drive or move any vehicle or equipment upon any street or highway equipped with any device or lamp thereon capable of or displaying a light of any other color than permitted by this section, except: an authorized emergency vehicle, an authorized school bus, [or] a vehicle authorized by a permit issued by the chief administrator, or a vehicle authorized to display green lights pursuant to subsection c. of R.S.39:3-54. (d)   A permit authorizing a vehicle to be equipped with a lamp capable of or displaying a flashing light, except as provided in [39:3-54] R.S.39:3-54 or a light of a color other than permitted by this section, visible from directly in front of said vehicle, may be issued by the 1[director] chief administrator1 when necessary, in 1[his] the chief administrators1 discretion, for the reasonable and safe movement of traffic. The permit shall specify the type and color of such lamp and the conditions under which a person may drive or move the vehicle with said lamp displaying a light. The permit shall be valid only when the specifications and conditions contained therein are complied with. The chief administrator shall collect a $25 fee for the initial issuance and for each subsequent renewal of the permit for each vehicle for which the applicant seeks to use such a light, provided, however, that no fee shall be charged for a permit authorizing the use of a light that is red or blue. The fee set forth in this section shall not apply to a motor vehicle registered at no fee pursuant to R.S.39:3-27. The fees collected pursuant to this section shall be considered revenue of the commission and shall not be subject to the calculation of proportional revenue remitted to the commission pursuant to section 105 of P.L.2003, c.13 (C.39:2A-36). The chief administrator may cancel or revoke a permit issued under authority of this section whenever the conditions for its issuance no longer exist or on any other reasonable grounds. (cf: P.L.2007, c.242, s.5) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.